Hawaii, session 2026, SB874.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The purpose of this Act is to promote consumer choice, affordability, and transparency by ensuring that pet owners in the State have the right to obtain and fill prescriptions for their animals at a pharmacy of their choice.  This Act is intended to remove barriers to competitive pricing, ensure fair access to veterinary medications, and enhance trust between veterinarians and their clients.  This Act also seeks to protect consumer rights while maintaining safety and efficacy in the dispensing of pet medications.  Additionally, this Act supports the integrity of veterinary practice by preserving the focus on medical care over retail functions and ensuring that veterinarians continue to play a central role in animal health management.  Lastly, this Act furthers the State's commitment to consumer rights, affordability, and fair market competition by aligning with existing consumer protection laws and economic policies, such as statutes against unfair or deceptive acts or practices, which promote transparency and fairness in consumer transactions and ensure pet owners, particularly those in rural or underserved areas, can access medications at reasonable costs while preserving high standards of veterinary care. SECTION 2.  Chapter 471, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§471-     Requirements for written prescriptions.  (a) A veterinarian shall, upon the request of a client, provide a written prescription for any medication prescribed for the client's animal patient without requiring the medication to be dispensed directly by the veterinarian. (b)  A veterinarian shall give notice to a client of the client's right to request a written prescription from the veterinarian and the option to have it filled at a pharmacy of the client's choice; provided that the notice shall be provided through direct communication at the time a prescription medication is recommended or prescribed, but need not be provided more than once per visit. (c)  No veterinarian shall issue a written prescription without the prior establishment of a veterinarian-client-patient relationship, which shall require that a veterinarian has conducted a timely examination of the animal patient or has made medically appropriate visits to the premises where the animal patient is kept. A veterinarian with an existing veterinarian-client-patient relationship shall also have sufficient knowledge of the animal patient's health to make an informed medical judgment and ensure the availability of follow-up care as needed. (d)  A written prescription shall contain all of the following information: (1)  The name and address of the prescribing veterinarian; (2)  The name and species of the animal patient; (3)  The name, strength, and quantity of the prescribed medication; (4)  Directions for use; (5)  The date of issuance; and (6)  The veterinarian's signature or equivalent. (e)  Any pharmacy duly licensed in the State may dispense the medication prescribed by a licensed veterinarian pursuant to this section; provided that all federal and state certification requirements for handling and dispensing veterinary pharmaceuticals are met. (f) Any veterinarian providing a written prescription shall not be held: (1)  Responsible for the improper storage, potential counterfeiting, medication substitution, or dosage errors that may be associated with dispensing from a third-party pharmacy; or (2)  Liable for any adverse effects or lack of efficacy in treatment due to externally sourced products. (g)  Any veterinarian who violates or fails to comply with this section shall be deemed to have engaged in professional misconduct and may be subject to disciplinary action by the board pursuant to section 471-10, which may include fines, the suspension or revocation of a license, or both. (h)  For the purposes of this section, "prescription" means a written order for medication issued by a veterinarian licensed in the State for the treatment of an animal patient." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.